District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Congress Cove Court Designation Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401, 403, and 421 of the Street and Alley Closing and
Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official
Code §§ 9-204.01, 9-204.03, and 9-204.21), the Council officially designates the public alley
system within Square 6153, Lots 84 and 85, bounded by 4th Street, SE and Atlantic Street, SE,
as depicted by the plat in the committee report, as “Congress Cove Court”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2